District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.89

Liabilities of Risk Officer, captive manager, and Advisory Council.

(a)

The Risk Officer, captive manager, and Advisory Council members shall not be liable for any obligations of the Agency.

(b)

The Risk Officer, captive manager, and Advisory Council members shall not be liable, or shall any cause of action of any nature arise against them, for any act or omission related to the performance of their powers and duties under this part, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 10, 55 DCR 6261